Hawaii statutes.
[§201-65] Reporting. The department
shall report biennially to the legislature on actions taken, problems
encountered, and legislative actions that may be needed to further implement
the intent of this part. [L 1985, c 237, pt of §4; am L 1987, c 87, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next